Missouri, session 2026, HB2419.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 188.021, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 188.021, to read as follows:
188.021. 1. When RU-486 (mifepristone) or any drug or chemical is used for the
purpose of inducing an abortion, [the initial dose] all doses of the drug or chemical shall be
administered in the same room and in the physical presence of the physician who prescribed,
dispensed, or otherwise provided the drug or chemical to the patient. The physician inducing
the abortion, or a person acting on such physician's behalf, shall make all reasonable efforts to
ensure that the patient returns after the administration or use of RU-486 or any drug or
chemical for a follow-up visit unless such termination of the pregnancy has already been
confirmed and the patient's medical condition has been assessed by a licensed physician prior
to discharge.
2. Prior to administering any drug or chemical used for the purpose of inducing
an abortion, the physician inducing the abortion shall:
(1) Perform an ultrasound to determine the gestational age of the unborn child;
(2) Provide information to the patient on the ability of qualified medical
professionals to potentially reverse the effects of an abortion obtained through the use of
abortion-inducing drugs or chemicals; and
(3) Provide information to the patient on abortion-reversal counseling resources
including, but not limited to, instruction on how to contact the H3HELPLINE.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2419 2
3. If a patient requests abortion-reversal medication after the administration of
any drug or chemical to induce an abortion, the physician shall administer such reversal
medication if medically appropriate or the physician shall immediately refer the patient
to another health care provider for the administration of such medication if medically
appropriate.
4. The physician administering the abortion shall inform the patient of her right
to sepulcher under section 194.119 and provide specific information on where the
patient may take the fetus if the fetus is delivered intact.
5. When the Food and Drug Administration label of any drug or chemical used for the
purpose of inducing an abortion includes any clinical study in which more than one percent of
those administered the drug or chemical required surgical intervention after its administration,
no physician may prescribe or administer such drug or chemical to any patient without first
obtaining approval from the department of health and senior services of a complication plan
from the physician for administration of the drug or chemical to any patient. The
complication plan shall include any information deemed necessary by the department to
ensure the safety of any patient suffering complications as a result of the administration of the
drug or chemical in question. No complication plan shall be required where the patient is
administered the drug in a medical emergency at a hospital and is then treated as an inpatient
at a hospital under medical monitoring by the hospital until the abortion is completed.
[3.] 6. The department may adopt rules, regulations, and standards governing
complication plans to ensure that patients undergoing abortions induced by drugs or
chemicals have access to safe and reliable care. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after October 24, 2017,
shall be invalid and void.
✔